Washington statutes.
RCW 35.53.040

Termination of trust in certain property.

A city or town which has heretofore acquired or hereafter acquires any property through foreclosure of delinquent assessments for local improvements initiated or proceedings commenced before June 8, 1927, may terminate its trust therein by an action in the superior court, if all the bonds and warrants outstanding in the local improvement district in which the assessments were levied are delinquent.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.53.040. Prior: 1929 c 142 s 1, part; RRS s 9384-1, part.]